Washington statutes.
RCW 15.60.055

Violations—Penalty.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a person who violates or fails to comply with any of the provisions of this chapter or any rule adopted under this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(2) A second or subsequent violation is a gross misdemeanor.

(3) Whenever the director finds that a person has committed a violation of any of the provisions of this chapter or any rule adopted under this chapter and that violation has not been punished as a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor, the director may impose and collect a civil penalty not exceeding one thousand dollars for each violation. Each violation shall be a separate and distinct offense. A person who knowingly, through an act of omission or commission, procures or aids or abets in the violation shall be considered to have violated this section and may be subject to the civil penalty.

[ 2003 c 53 s 107; 1993 c 89 s 17; 1991 c 363 s 15; 1989 c 354 s 64. Formerly RCW 15.60.170.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.

Severability—1989 c 354: See note following RCW 15.36.012.